src/main/resources/hyph/en.xml
    <patterns>
        .ach4
        .ad4der
        .af1t
        .al3t
        .am5at
        .an5c
        .ang4
        .ani5m
        .ant4
        .an3te
        .anti5s
        .ar5s
        .ar4tie
        .ar4ty
        .as3c
        .as1p
        .as1s
        .aster5
        .atom5
        .au1d
        .av4i
        .awn4
        .ba4g
        .ba5na
        .bas4e
        .ber4
        .be5ra
        .be3sm
        .be5sto
        .bri2
        .but4ti
        .cam4pe
        .can5c
        .capa5b
        .car5ol
        .ca4t
        .ce4la
        .ch4
        .chill5i
        .ci2
        .cit5r
        .co3e
        .co4r
        .cor5ner
        .de4moi
        .de3o
        .de3ra
        .de3ri
        .des4c
        .dictio5
        .do4t
        .du4c
        .dumb5
        .earth5
        .eas3i
        .eb4
        .eer4
        .eg2
        .el5d
        .el3em
        .enam3
        .en3g
        .en3s
        .eq5ui5t
        .er4ri
        .es3
        .eu3
        .eye5
        .fes3
        .for5mer
        .ga2
        .ge2
        .gen3t4
        .ge5og
        .gi5a
        .gi4b
        .go4r
        .hand5i
        .han5k
        .he2
        .hero5i
        .hes3
        .het3
        .hi3b
        .hi3er
        .hon5ey
        .hon3o
        .hov5
        .id4l
        .idol3
        .im3m
        .im5pin
        .in1
        .in3ci
        .ine2
        .in2k
        .in3s
        .ir5r
        .is4i
        .ju3r
        .la4cy
        .la4m
        .lat5er
        .lath5
        .le2
        .leg5e
        .len4
        .lep5
        .lev1
        .li4g
        .lig5a
        .li2n
        .li3o
        .li4t
        .mag5a5
        .mal5o
        .man5a
        .mar5ti
        .me2
        .mer3c
        .me5ter
        .mis1
        .mist5i
        .mon3e
        .mo3ro
        .mu5ta
        .muta5b
        .ni4c
        .od2
        .odd5
        .of5te
        .or5ato
        .or3c
        .or1d
        .or3t
        .os3
        .os4tl
        .oth3
        .out3
        .ped5al
        .pe5te
        .pe5tit
        .pi4e
        .pio5n
        .pi2t
        .pre3m
        .ra4c
        .ran4t
        .ratio5na
        .ree2
        .re5mit
        .res2
        .re5stat
        .ri4g
        .rit5u
        .ro4q
        .ros5t
        .row5d
        .ru4d
        .sci3e
        .self5
        .sell5
        .se2n
        .se5rie
        .sh2
        .si2
        .sing4
        .st4
        .sta5bl
        .sy2
        .ta4
        .te4
        .ten5an
        .th2
        .ti2
        .til4
        .tim5o5
        .ting4
        .tin5k
        .ton4a
        .to4p
        .top5i
        .tou5s
        .trib5ut
        .un1a
        .un3ce
        .under5
        .un1e
        .un5k
        .un5o
        .un3u
        .up3
        .ure3
        .us5a
        .ven4de
        .ve5ra
        .wil5i
        .ye4
        4ab.
        a5bal
        a5ban
        abe2
        ab5erd
        abi5a
        ab5it5ab
        ab5lat
        ab5o5liz
        4abr
        ab5rog
        ab3ul
        a4car
        ac5ard
        ac5aro
        a5ceou
        ac1er
        a5chet
        4a2ci
        a3cie
        ac1in
        a3cio
        ac5rob
        act5if
        ac3ul
        ac4um
        a2d
        ad4din
        ad5er.
        2adi
        a3dia
        ad3ica
        adi4er
        a3dio
        a3dit
        a5diu
        ad4le
        ad3ow
        ad5ran
        ad4su
        4adu
        a3duc
        ad5um
        ae4r
        aeri4e
        a2f
        aff4
        a4gab
        aga4n
        ag5ell
        age4o
        4ageu
        ag1i
        4ag4l
        ag1n
        a2go
        3agog
        ag3oni
        a5guer
        ag5ul
        a4gy
        a3ha
        a3he
        ah4l
        a3ho
        ai2
        a5ia
        a3ic.
        ai5ly
        a4i4n
        ain5in
        ain5o
        ait5en
        a1j
        ak1en
        al5ab
        al3ad
        a4lar
        4aldi
        2ale
        al3end
        a4lenti
        a5le5o
        al1i
        al4ia.
        ali4e
        al5lev
        4allic
        4alm
        a5log.
        a4ly.
        4alys
        5a5lyst
        5alyt
        3alyz
        4ama
        am5ab
        am3ag
        ama5ra
        am5asc
        a4matis
        a4m5ato
        am5era
        am3ic
        am5if
        am5ily
        am1in
        ami4no
        a2mo
        a5mon
        amor5i
        amp5en
        a2n
        an3age
        3analy
        a3nar
        an3arc
        anar4i
        a3nati
        4and
        ande4s
        an3dis
        an1dl
        an4dow
        a5nee
        a3nen
        an5est.
        a3neu
        2ang
        ang5ie
        an1gl
        a4n1ic
        a3nies
        an3i3f
        an4ime
        a5nimi
        a5nine
        an3io
        a3nip
        an3ish
        an3it
        a3niu
        an4kli
        5anniz
        ano4
        an5ot
        anoth5
        an2sa
        an4sco
        an4sn
        an2sp
        ans3po
        an4st
        an4sur
        antal4
        an4tie
        4anto
        an2tr
        an4tw
        an3ua
        an3ul
        a5nur
        4ao
        apar4
        ap5at
        ap5ero
        a3pher
        4aphi
        a4pilla
        ap5illar
        ap3in
        ap3ita
        a3pitu
        a2pl
        apoc5
        ap5ola
        apor5i
        apos3t
        aps5es
        a3pu
        aque5
        2a2r
        ar3act
        a5rade
        ar5adis
        ar3al
        a5ramete
        aran4g
        ara3p
        ar4at
        a5ratio
        ar5ativ
        a5rau
        ar5av4
        araw4
        arbal4
        ar4chan
        ar5dine
        ar4dr
        ar5eas
        a3ree
        ar3ent
        a5ress
        ar4fi
        ar4fl
        ar1i
        ar5ial
        ar3ian
        a3riet
        ar4im
        ar5inat
        ar3io
        ar2iz
        ar2mi
        ar5o5d
        a5roni
        a3roo
        ar2p
        ar3q
        arre4
        ar4sa
        ar2sh
        4as.
        as4ab
        as3ant
        ashi4
        a5sia.
        a3sib
        a3sic
        5a5si4t
        ask3i
        as4l
        a4soc
        as5ph
        as4sh
        as3ten
        as1tr
        asur5a
        a2ta
        at3abl
        at5ac
        at3alo
        at5ap
        ate5c
        at5ech
        at3ego
        at3en.
        at3era
        ater5n
        a5terna
        at3est
        at5ev
        4ath
        ath5em
        a5then
        at4ho
        ath5om
        4ati.
        a5tia
        at5i5b
        at1ic
        at3if
        ation5ar
        at3itu
        a4tog
        a2tom
        at5omiz
        a4top
        a4tos
        a1tr
        at5rop
        at4sk
        at4tag
        at5te
        at4th
        a2tu
        at5ua
        at5ue
        at3ul
        at3ura
        a2ty
        au4b
        augh3
        au3gu
        au4l2
        aun5d
        au3r
        au5sib
        aut5en
        au1th
        a2va
        av3ag
        a5van
        ave4no
        av3era
        av5ern
        av5ery
        av1i
        avi4er
        av3ig
        av5oc
        a1vor
        3away
        aw3i
        aw4ly
        aws4
        ax4ic
        ax4id
        ay5al
        aye4
        ays4
        azi4er
        azz5i
        5ba.
        bad5ger
        ba4ge
        bal1a
        ban5dag
        ban4e
        ban3i
        barbi5
        bari4a
        bas4si
        1bat
        ba4z
        2b1b
        b2be
        b3ber
        bbi4na
        4b1d
        4be.
        beak4
        beat3
        4be2d
        be3da
        be3de
        be3di
        be3gi
        be5gu
        1bel
        be1li
        be3lo
        4be5m
        be5nig
        be5nu
        4bes4
        be3sp
        be5str
        3bet
        bet5iz
        be5tr
        be3tw
        be3w
        be5yo
        2bf
        4b3h
        bi2b
        bi4d
        3bie
        bi5en
        bi4er
        2b3if
        1bil
        bi3liz
        bina5r4
        bin4d
        bi5net
        bi3ogr
        bi5ou
        bi2t
        3bi3tio
        bi3tr
        3bit5ua
        b5itz
        b1j
        bk4
        b2l2
        blath5
        b4le.
        blen4
        5blesp
        b3lis
        b4lo
        blun4t
        4b1m
        4b3n
        bne5g
        3bod
        bod3i
        bo4e
        bol3ic
        bom4bi
        bon4a
        bon5at
        3boo
        5bor.
        4b1ora
        bor5d
        5bore
        5bori
        5bos4
        b5ota
        both5
        bo4to
        bound3
        4bp
        4brit
        broth3
        2b5s2
        bsor4
        2bt
        bt4l
        b4to
        b3tr
        buf4fer
        bu4ga
        bu3li
        bumi4
        bu4n
        bunt4i
        bu3re
        bus5ie
        buss4e
        5bust
        4buta
        3butio
        b5uto
        b1v
        4b5w
        5by.
        bys4
        1ca
        cab3in
        ca1bl
        cach4
        ca5den
        4cag4
        2c5ah
        ca3lat
        cal4la
        call5in
        4calo
        can5d
        can4e
        can4ic
        can5is
        can3iz
        can4ty
        cany4
        ca5per
        car5om
        cast5er
        cas5tig
        4casy
        ca4th
        4cativ
        cav5al
        c3c
        ccha5
        cci4a
        ccompa5
        ccon4
        ccou3t
        2ce.
        4ced.
        4ceden
        3cei
        5cel.
        3cell
        1cen
        3cenc
        2cen4e
        4ceni
        3cent
        3cep
        ce5ram
        4cesa
        3cessi
        ces5si5b
        ces5t
        cet4
        c5e4ta
        cew4
        2ch
        4ch.
        4ch3ab
        5chanic
        ch5a5nis
        che2
        cheap3
        4ched
        che5lo
        3chemi
        ch5ene
        ch3er.
        ch3ers
        4ch1in
        5chine.
        ch5iness
        5chini
        5chio
        3chit
        chi2z
        3cho2
        ch4ti
        1ci
        3cia
        ci2a5b
        cia5r
        ci5c
        4cier
        5cific.
        4cii
        ci4la
        3cili
        2cim
        2cin
        c4ina
        3cinat
        cin3em
        c1ing
        c5ing.
        5cino
        cion4
        4cipe
        ci3ph
        4cipic
        4cista
        4cisti
        2c1it
        cit3iz
        5ciz
        ck1
        ck3i
        1c4l4
        4clar
        c5laratio
        5clare
        cle4m
        4clic
        clim4
        cly4
        c5n
        1co
        co5ag
        coe2
        2cog
        co4gr
        coi4
        co3inc
        col5i
        5colo
        col3or
        com5er
        con4a
        c4one
        con3g
        con5t
        co3pa
        cop3ic
        co4pl
        4corb
        coro3n
        cos4e
        cov1
        cove4
        cow5a
        coz5e
        co5zi
        c1q
        cras5t
        5crat.
        5cratic
        cre3at
        5cred
        4c3reta
        cre4v
        cri2
        cri5f
        c4rin
        cris4
        5criti
        cro4pl
        crop5o
        cros4e
        cru4d
        4c3s2
        2c1t
        cta4b
        ct5ang
        c5tant
        c2te
        c3ter
        c4ticu
        ctim3i
        ctu4r
        c4tw
        cud5
        c4uf
        c4ui
        cu5ity
        5culi
        cul4tis
        3cultu
        cu2ma
        c3ume
        cu4mi
        3cun
        cu3pi
        cu5py
        cur5a4b
        cu5ria
        1cus
        cuss4i
        3c4ut
        cu4tie
        4c5utiv
        4cutr
        1cy
        cze4
        1d2a
        5da.
        2d3a4b
        dach4
        4daf
        2dag
        da2m2
        dan3g
        dard5
        dark5
        4dary
        3dat
        4dativ
        4dato
        5dav4
        dav5e
        5day
        d1b
        d5c
        d1d4
